Maryland, session 2026, HB0920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
10–804.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE” MEANS A DATABASE
USED BY REAL ESTATE PROFESSIONALS TO FACILITATE THE SALE OF REAL
PROPERTY, INCLUDING USE IN THE PREPARATION OF MARKET EVALUATIONS AND
APPRAISALS.
(B) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE SALE OF A NEW HOME IN THE STATE, A
DEVELOPER, BUILDER, BROKER, OR REAL ESTATE AGENT SHALL ENTER THE FINAL
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0920*

HOUSE BILL 920
SALE PRICE OF THE NEW HOME INTO A MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE OR SIMILARLY
ACCESSIBLE DATABASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.